src/fst/stems/verbs.lexc
LEXICON VerbRoot

ropa v1 ;
ringa:ring v2 ;
fräsa:fräs v2b ; ! just nu INTE via twolc
resa:res v2b ;  ! via lexc
tro:tro v3 ;
söka:sök v2b ;
läsa:läs v2b ;

! oregelbundna verb
vara+V+Inf:vara # ;
vara+V+Ind+Prs:är # ;
vara+V+Ind+Prt:var # ;
vara+V+Sup:varit # ;
vara+V+Imp:var # ;

skola+V+Inf:skola # ;
skola+V+Ind+Prs:ska # ;
skola+V+Ind+Prs:skall # ;
skola+V+Ind+Prt:skulle # ;
skola+V+Sup:skolat # ;

simma v1 ;
simma+V+Ind+Prt:sam # ;

ha+V+Inf:ha # ;
ha+V+Inf:hava # ;
ha+V+Ind+Prs:har # ;
ha+V+Ind+Prt:hade # ;
ha+V+Sup:haft # ;
ha+V+PrfPtc:havd # ;
ha+V+Imp:ha # ;


! stark böjning IAU

springa:spr%^IAUng vST_C ;
springa+V+Imp:spring # ;

finna:f%^IAUnn vST_C ;
finna+V+Imp:finn # ;

hinna:h%^IAUnn vST_C ;
hinna+V+Imp:hinn # ;

brinna:br%^IAUnn vST_C ;
brinna+V+Imp:brinn # ;

vinna:v%^IAUnn vST_C ;
vinna+V+Imp:vinn # ;

rinna:r%^IAUnn vST_C ;
rinna+V+Imp:rinn # ;

spinna:sp%^IAUnn vST_C ;
spinna+V+Imp:spinn # ;

! stark böjning IEI
bita:b%^IEIt vST_C ;
bita+V+Imp:bit # ;

gnida:gn%^IEId vST_C ;
gnida+V+Imp:gnid # ;

skriva:skr%^IEIv vST_C ;
skriva+V+Imp:skriv # ;

skita:sk%^IEIt vST_C ;
skita+V+Imp:skit # ;

bliva:bl%^IEIv vST_C ;
bliva+V+Imp:bliv # ;
bliva+V+Imp:bli # ;
bli+V+Inf:bli # ;
bli+V+Ind+Prs:blir # ;

! Stark böjning ÅIÅ
få:f%^ÅIÅ v_ÅIÅ ;
få+V+PrfPtc:fådd # ;

gå:g%^ÅIÅ v_ÅIÅ ;
gå+V+PrfPtc:gången # ;
